Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5912.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-19 of the General Laws entitled "Evidence" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
9-19-45. Fair and reasonable charge for medical and healthcare services in all civil
actions.
In all civil actions now or hereafter pending in any court, agency, arbitration forum, or
other tribunal based upon a cause of action for injury or for wrongful death, including causes of
action based upon medical, dental, or professional malpractice, the fair and reasonable charge for
medical, hospital, therapeutic, and other health care services shall be the amount billed by the
licensed health care provider. The amount paid to the licensed health care provider by any health,
accident or disability insurer, any state or federal health insurance or disability program, any
medical payments or personal injury protection insurance, or any workers' compensation benefits,
and the acceptance thereof by the licensed health care provider in full satisfaction of the amount
billed, shall be inadmissible as evidence of the fair and reasonable charge for such services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002298
========